Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 HF 2775 (3) 91 ms/js/md H.F. 2775 Section 1. Section 321G.4, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. The owner of the snowmobile shall file an application for 3 registration with the department through the county recorder 4 of the county of residence in the manner established by the 5 commission. The application shall be completed by the owner 6 and shall be accompanied by a fee of thirty dollars and a 7 writing fee in accordance with section 321G.27 . In addition, 8 the county recorder may charge a convenience fee in accordance 9 with section 331.604, subsection 1, paragraph âbâ . A snowmobile 10 shall not be registered by the county recorder until the 11 county recorder is presented with receipts, bills of sale, 12 or other satisfactory evidence that the sales or use tax has 13 been paid for the purchase of the snowmobile or that the 14 owner is exempt from paying the tax. A snowmobile that has 15 an expired registration certificate from another state may be 16 registered in this state upon proper application, payment of 17 all applicable registration and writing fees, and payment of a 18 penalty of five dollars. 19 Sec. 2. Section 321I.4, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 20 2026, is amended to read as follows: 21 a. The owner of the all-terrain vehicle shall file an 22 application for registration with the department through the 23 county recorder of the county of residence, or in the case 24 of a nonresident owner, in the county of primary use, in 25 the manner established by the commission. The application 26 shall be completed by the owner and shall be accompanied 27 by a fee of fifteen dollars and a writing fee as provided 28 in section 321I.29 . In addition, the county recorder may 29 charge a convenience fee in accordance with section 331.604, 30 subsection 1, paragraph âbâ . An all-terrain vehicle shall 31 not be registered by the county recorder until the county 32 recorder is presented with receipts, bills of sale, or other 33 satisfactory evidence that the sales or use tax has been paid 34 for the purchase of the all-terrain vehicle or that the owner 35 -1- HF 2775 (3) 91 ms/js/md 1/ 3 H.F. 2775 is exempt from paying the tax. An all-terrain vehicle that has 1 an expired registration certificate from another state may be 2 registered in this state upon proper application, payment of 3 all applicable registration and writing fees, and payment of a 4 penalty of five dollars. 5 Sec. 3. Section 331.604, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 1. a. Except as otherwise provided by state law, paragraph 8 âbâ of this subsection, subsection 4 , or section 331.605 , the 9 recorder shall collect a fee of five dollars for each page or 10 fraction of a page of an instrument which that is filed or 11 recorded in the recorderâs office. If a page or fraction of 12 a page contains more than one transaction, the recorder shall 13 collect the fee for each transaction. 14 b. The recorder may also charge, in addition to any 15 other fee imposed by law, a convenience fee for the filing 16 or recording of an application for the registration of a 17 snowmobile, all-terrain vehicle, or vessel for a person who is 18 not a resident of the county, unless that person pays property 19 tax to the county and provides proof of payment such as a 20 receipt as provided in section 445.5, subsection 6, or another 21 form of proof as determined by the county. The recorder shall 22 not charge a convenience fee in excess of ten dollars. All 23 moneys collected pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited 24 into the county recorderâs records management fund and used for 25 the purposes described in subsection 2, paragraph âbâ . 26 Sec. 4. Section 462A.5, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 27 2026, is amended to read as follows: 28 a. The owner of the vessel shall file an application for 29 registration with the appropriate county recorder on forms 30 provided by the commission. The application shall be completed 31 and signed by the owner of the vessel and shall be accompanied 32 by the appropriate fee, and the writing fee specified in 33 section 462A.53 . In addition, the county recorder may charge a 34 convenience fee in accordance with section 331.604, subsection 35 -2- HF 2775 (3) 91 ms/js/md 2/ 3 H.F. 2775 1, paragraph âbâ . Upon applying for registration, the owner 1 shall display a bill of sale, receipt, or other satisfactory 2 proof of ownership as provided by the rules of the commission 3 to the county recorder. If the county recorder is not 4 satisfied as to the ownership of the vessel or that there are 5 no undisclosed security interests in the vessel, the county 6 recorder may register the vessel but shall, as a condition of 7 issuing a registration certificate, require the applicant to 8 follow the procedure provided in section 462A.5A . Upon receipt 9 of the application in approved form accompanied by the required 10 fees, the county recorder shall enter it upon the records 11 of the recorderâs office and shall issue to the applicant a 12 pocket-size registration certificate. The certificate shall 13 be executed and delivered to the owner. The county recorder 14 shall maintain an electronic record of each registration 15 certificate issued by the county recorder under this chapter . 16 The registration certificate shall bear the number awarded 17 to the vessel, the passenger capacity of the vessel, and the 18 name and address of the owner. In the use of all vessels 19 except nonpowered sailboats, nonpowered canoes, and commercial 20 vessels, the registration certificate shall be carried either 21 in the vessel or on the person of the operator of the vessel 22 when in use. In the use of nonpowered sailboats, nonpowered 23 canoes, or commercial vessels, the registration certificate 24 may be kept on shore in accordance with rules adopted by the 25 commission. The operator shall exhibit the certificate to a 26 peace officer upon request or, when involved in an occurrence 27 of any nature with another vessel or other personal property, 28 to the owner or operator of the other vessel or personal 29 property. 30 -3- HF 2775 (3) 91 ms/js/md 3/ 3